Utah statutes.
53B-17-901.   Admissions -- Increase authorized.

(1)  Beginning with the 2013-14 school year and subject to Subsection (2), the University of Utah School of Medicine may increase the number of students admitted by 40 students for a total of 122 students admitted annually.

(2)  Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, no fewer than 82% of the students admitted annually shall:

(a)  meet the qualifications of a resident student for the purpose of tuition in accordance with:

(i)  Section 53B-8-102;

(ii)  State Board of Regents policy on determining resident status; and

(iii)  University of Utah policy on determining resident status;

(b)  have graduated from a public or private college or university located in Utah; or

(c)  have graduated from a public or private high school located in Utah.



Enacted by Chapter 302, 2013 General Session

